Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.525.200

Allocation and distribution of funds for school plant facilities governed by chapter.

Notwithstanding any other provision of RCW 28A.525.010 through 28A.525.200, the allocation and distribution of funds by the superintendent of public instruction, considering policy recommendations from the school facilities citizen advisory panel, for the purposes of providing assistance in the construction of school plant facilities shall be governed by this chapter.

[ 2015 1st sp.s. c 4 s 24; 2006 c 263 s 320; 1990 c 33 s 465; 1985 c 136 s 2; 1977 ex.s. c 227 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.47.830.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.